Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 7.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201079-1007.05
Focus school
and program allowance; calculation.

For school
fiscal year 2008-09 and each school fiscal year thereafter, the department
shall determine the focus school and program allowance for each school district
in a learning community which submits the information required
for the calculation on a form prescribed by the department on or before October
15 of the school fiscal year preceding the school fiscal year for which aid
is being calculated. Such form may require confirmation from a learning community
official that the focus school or program has been approved by the learning
community coordinating council for the school fiscal year for which the allowance
is being calculated. The focus school and program allowance for each school
district in a learning community shall equal the sum of the allowances calculated
pursuant to this section for each focus school and focus program operated
by the school district for the school fiscal year for which aid is being calculated.

For the school fiscal year containing
the majority of the first school year that a school or program will be in
operation as a focus school or program approved by the learning community
and meeting the requirements of section 79-769, the focus school and program
allowance for such focus school or program shall equal the statewide average
general fund operating expenditures per formula student multiplied by 0.10
then multiplied by the estimated number of students who will be participating
in the focus school or program as reported on the form required pursuant to
this section.

For the school fiscal year containing
the majority of the second school year that a school or program will be in
operation as a focus school or program approved by the learning community
and meeting the requirements of section 79-769, the focus school and program
allowance for such focus school or program shall equal the statewide average
general fund operating expenditures per formula student multiplied by 0.10
then multiplied by (1) for state aid certified pursuant to section 79-1022,
the difference of the product of two multiplied by the number of students
participating in the focus school or program as reported on the fall membership
report from the school fiscal year immediately preceding the school fiscal
year in which the aid is to be paid minus the estimated number of students
used in the certification of state aid pursuant to section 79-1022 for the
school fiscal year immediately preceding the school fiscal year in which the
aid is to be paid and (2) for the final calculation of state aid pursuant
to section 79-1065, the difference of the product of two multiplied by the
number of students participating in the focus school or program as reported
on the annual statistical summary report from the school fiscal year immediately
preceding the school fiscal year in which the aid was paid minus the estimated
number of students used in the final calculation of state aid pursuant to
section 79-1065 for the school fiscal year immediately preceding the school
fiscal year in which the aid is to be paid.

For the school fiscal year containing
the majority of the third school year that a school or program will be in
operation as a focus school or program approved by the learning community
and meeting the requirements of section 79-769 and each school fiscal year
thereafter, the focus school and program allowance for such focus school or program shall
equal the statewide average general fund operating expenditures per formula
student multiplied by 0.10 then multiplied by the number of students participating
in the focus school or program
as reported on the fall membership report from the school fiscal year immediately
preceding the school fiscal year in which the aid is to be paid for state
aid certified pursuant to section 79-1022 and as reported on the annual statistical
summary report from the school fiscal year immediately preceding the school
fiscal year in which the aid was paid for the final calculation of state aid
pursuant to section 79-1065.

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 78;

Laws 2007, LB641, § 18;

Laws 2010, LB1070, § 7;

Laws 2010, LB1071, § 15.
The Revisor of Statutes has pursuant to section 49-769 correlated LB1070, section 7, with LB1071, section 15, to reflect all amendments.Changes made by LB1070 became effective April 6, 2010. Changes made by LB1071 became operative July 15, 2010.